Washington statutes.
RCW 39.110.110

Protection and enforcement of rights of bond owners and trustees—Bonds as securities.

(1) Any owner of bonds issued under this chapter by any authority, and the trustee under any trust agreement or indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceeding, protect and enforce any of their respective rights, and may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if the person is the highest bidder, except to the extent the rights given are restricted by the authority in any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(2) The bonds of an authority are securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state and all counties, cities, municipal corporations, and political subdivisions, all banks, eligible banking organizations, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance companies and associations, and all executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control. However, a municipality under the auspices of which an authority was created and the county, city, or town within whose planning jurisdiction the economic development activity to be financed lies, may not invest in bonds issued by the authority.

[ 2012 c 193 s 13.]